Nebraska, session 109, LB387.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB387 LB387
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 83-170, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-170 As used in the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Board means the Board of Parole;
(2) Committed offender means any person who, under any provision of
law, is sentenced or committed to a facility operated by the department
or is sentenced or committed to the department other than a person
adjudged to be as described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of
section 43-247 by a juvenile court;
(3) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(4) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(5) Director of Supervision and Services means the Director of
Supervision and Services appointed pursuant to section 83-1,101;
(6) Facility means any prison, reformatory, training school,
reception center, community guidance center, group home, or other
institution operated by the department;
(7) Good time means any reduction of sentence granted pursuant to
sections 83-1,107 and 83-1,108;
(8) Maximum term means the maximum sentence provided by law or the
maximum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is shorter;
(9) Minimum term means the minimum sentence provided by law or the
minimum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is longer;
(10) Pardon authority means the power to remit fines and forfeitures
and to grant respites, reprieves, pardons, or commutations;
(11) Parole term means the time from release on parole to the
completion of the maximum term, reduced by good time;
(12) Person committed to the department means any person sentenced
or committed to a facility within the department;
(13) Restrictive housing means conditions of confinement that
provide limited contact with other offenders, strictly controlled
-2-

LB387 LB387
2025 2025
movement while out of cell, and out-of-cell time of less than twenty-four
hours per week; and
(14) Solitary confinement means the status of confinement of an
inmate in an individual cell having solid, soundproof doors and which
deprives the inmate of all visual and auditory contact with other
persons.
Sec. 2. Original section 83-170, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-